Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1064.01
Order granting an injunction; restraining order; requirements.

Every order granting an injunction and every restraining order shall: (1) Set forth the reasons for its issuance; (2) be specific in terms; (3) describe in reasonable detail, and not by reference to the pleading or other document, the act or acts sought to be restrained; and (4) be binding only upon the parties to the action, their officers, agents, servants, employees, and attorneys, and those persons in active concert or participation with them who receive actual notice of the order by personal service or otherwise.

Laws 1986, LB 516, § 12;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 21.